Utah statutes.
73-26-404.   Eminent domain.

In order to construct the reservoirs and other facilities authorized under this chapter, the division may exercise eminent domain as provided in Title 78B, Chapter 6, Part 5, Eminent Domain.



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

